Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 17 Veterans’ Affairs [Repealed.]

30-17-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 88, § 7; P.L. 1901, ch. 809, § 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 104, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 116, § 7; P.L. 1927, ch. 960, § 1; P.L. 1930, ch. 1555, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 654, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, §§ 65, 80; impl. am. P.L. 1949, ch. 2166, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-17-1

; P.L. 1976, ch. 103, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 313, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2009, ch. 233, § 7, and by P.L. 2009, ch. 234, § 7, effective July 1, 2010.

30-17-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 88, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 104, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 116, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 654, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1949, ch. 2166, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-17-2

; P.L. 1976, ch. 103, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 566, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2009, ch. 233, § 7, and by P.L. 2009, ch. 234, § 7, effective July 1, 2010.

30-17-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 88, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 104, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 116, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 654, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

30-17-3

; Repealed by P.L. 1976, ch. 103, § 3.

30-17-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 88, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 104, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 116, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 654, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; G.L. 1956, §

30-17-4

; P.L. 1976, ch. 103, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 313, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2009, ch. 233, § 7, and by P.L. 2009, ch. 234, § 7, effective July 1, 2010.

30-17-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 88, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 104, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 116, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 654, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-17-5

; P.L. 1976, ch. 103, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 432, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2009, ch. 233, § 7, and by P.L. 2009, ch. 234, § 7, effective July 1, 2010.

30-17-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 88, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 104, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 116, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 654, § 10; impl. am. P.L. 1949, ch. 2166, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-17-6

; P.L. 1976, ch. 103, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2009, ch. 233, § 7, and by P.L. 2009, ch. 234, § 7, effective July 1, 2010.

30-17-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1898, ch. 573, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 104, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 116, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 654, § 11; P.L. 1944, ch. 1476, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-17-7

; Repealed by P.L. 1976, ch. 103, § 3.

30-17-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 88, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 104, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 116, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 654, § 15; impl. am. P.L. 1949, ch. 2166, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-17-8

; P.L. 1976, ch. 103, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2009, ch. 233, § 7, and by P.L. 2009, ch. 234, § 7, effective July 1, 2010.

30-17-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 88, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 104, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch.116, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 654, § 16; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-17-9

; P.L. 1976, ch. 103, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch 313, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2009, ch. 233, § 7, and by P.L. 2009, ch. 234, § 7, effective July 1, 2010.